New York, session 2025-2026, A11132.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Subparagraph 7 of paragraph (a) of subdivision 2 of section 2 211 of the retirement and social security law, as amended by chapter 840 3 of the laws of 1983, is amended and a new subparagraph 8 is added to 4 read as follows: 5 (7) the chief administrator of the courts if such person is to be 6 employed in a judicial or nonjudicial position in the unified court 7 system[.]; or 8 (8) the supervisor of the town of Fishkill, in the case of Christopher 9 Strattner, a retired police officer, to be employed as chief of police 10 for the town of Fishkill police department. 11 § 2. Subparagraph 2 of paragraph (b) of subdivision 2 of section 211 12 of the retirement and social security law, as amended by chapter 640 of 13 the laws of 2008, is amended to read as follows: 14 (2) that [he or she] such retired person will earn more than one thou- 15 sand dollars in one year, including compensation earned in such position 16 under other provisions of this article that there are not readily avail- 17 able for recruitment persons qualified to perform the duties of such 18 position; [and (4)];] 19 § 3. Section 211 of the retirement and social security law is amended 20 by adding a new subdivision 10 to read as follows: 21 10. For purposes of paragraph (b) of subdivision one of this section, 22 a retired person who served as a police officer is not in service of a 23 former employer if such retired person is Christopher Strattner serving 24 as chief of police for the town of Fishkill after retirement from the 25 police department. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD15590-01-6 A. 11132 2 1 § 4. Section 212 of the retirement and social security law is amended 2 by adding a new subdivision 4 to read as follows: 3 4. Notwithstanding the provisions of subdivisions one and two of this 4 section, the supervisor of the town of Fishkill may determine, pursuant 5 to section two hundred eleven of this article, that such earnings limi- 6 tations shall not apply to Christopher Strattner, retired police officer 7 employed by the town of Fishkill police department as chief of police of 8 the Fishkill police department. 9 § 5. The provisions of this act shall apply only to Christopher 10 Strattner and shall not be construed to apply to any other individual. 11 § 6. This act shall take effect immediately.